Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.25.010

Powers, rights, and obligations—Definition—Application of RCW 23B.03.010.

(1) Except as otherwise expressly stated in this chapter, the provisions of this title and all powers, rights, and obligations thereunder shall apply to social purpose corporations organized under this chapter, and references in this title to the term "corporation" shall be read to include social purpose corporations organized under this chapter.

(2) Subject to any limitations contained in the articles of incorporation, a social purpose corporation may engage in any lawful business under RCW 23B.03.010.

[ 2012 c 215 s 2.]